Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 91 School and Youth Programs Concussion Act

16-91-1.
Findings of fact.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares: (1) Concussions are one of the most commonly reported injuries in children and adolescents who participate in sports and recreational activities. A concussion is caused by a blow or motion to the head or body that causes the brain to move rapidly inside the skull. The risk of catastrophic injuries or death is significant when a concussion or head injury is not properly evaluated and managed.

(2)

Concussions are a type of brain injury that can range from mild to severe and can disrupt the way the brain normally works. Concussions can occur in any organized or unorganized sport or recreational activity and can result from a fall or from players colliding with each other, the ground, or with obstacles. Concussions occur with or without loss of consciousness, but the vast majority occurs without loss of consciousness.

(3)

Continuing to play with a concussion or symptoms of a head injury leaves the young athlete especially vulnerable to greater injury and even death. The general assembly also recognizes that, despite having generally recognized return-to-play standards for concussion and head injury, some affected youth athletes are prematurely returned to play resulting in actual or potential physical injury or death to youth athletes in the state of Rhode Island.

(4)

Concussions can occur in any sport or recreational activity, furthermore, symptoms of concussions may manifest themselves after the injury during school hours and in the classroom setting. All school nurses, coaches, parents, and athletes shall be advised of the signs and symptoms of concussions as well as the protocol for treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 401, § 1.

16-91-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this section, the term “youth sports programs” means any program organized for recreational and/or athletic competition purposes by any school district or by any school participating in Rhode Island Interscholastic League Competition, and whose participants are nineteen (19) years of age or younger.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 237, § 1.

16-91-3.
School district’s guidelines to be developed and implemented.

The department of education and the department of health shall work in concert with the Rhode Island Interscholastic League to develop and promulgate guidelines to inform and educate coaches, teachers, school nurses, youth athletes, and their parents and/or guardians of the nature and risk of concussion and head injury, including continuing to play after concussion or head injury. A concussion and head injury information sheet shall be signed and returned by the youth athlete and the athlete’s parent and/or guardian prior to the youth athlete’s return to practice or competition.

School districts are required to use training materials made available by the United States Center for Disease Control and Prevention entitled “Heads Up: Concussion in the High School Sports/Concussion in Youth Sports” and any updates or amendments thereto, or training materials substantively and substantially similar thereto. The department of education shall post training materials made available by the Center for Disease Control and Prevention and the Rhode Island Interscholastic League on its website. All coaches and volunteers involved in a youth sport or activity covered by this chapter must complete a training course and a refresher course annually thereafter in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. All school nurses must complete a training course and an annual refresher course in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. Teachers and teachers’ aides are strongly encouraged to complete the training course in concussions and traumatic brain injuries. Training may consist of videos, classes, and any other generally accepted mode and medium of providing information.

School districts are encouraged to have all student athletes perform baseline neuropsychological testing, computerized or otherwise. Parents and/or guardians shall be provided with information as to the risk of concussion and/or traumatic brain injuries prior to the start of every sport season and they shall sign an acknowledgement as to their receipt of such information.

A youth athlete, who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or head injury in a practice or game, shall be removed from competition at that time.

A youth athlete, who has been removed from play, may not return to play until the athlete is evaluated by a licensed physician who may consult with an athletic trainer, all of whom shall be trained in the evaluation and management of concussions. The athlete must receive written clearance to return to play from that licensed physician.

All school districts are encouraged to have an athletic trainer, or similarly trained person, at all recreational and athletic events addressed by this statute.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 370, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 401, § 1.

16-91-4.
All other youth sports program.

All other youth sports programs not specifically addressed by this statute are encouraged to follow the guidance set forth in this statute for all program participants who are age nineteen (19) and younger.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 22, § 1.